Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6011
Risk-based capital level, defined.

Risk-based capital level means an insurer's or a health organization's company action level risk-based capital, regulatory action level risk-based capital, authorized control level risk-based capital, or mandatory control level risk-based capital. For purposes of this section:

(1) Authorized control level risk-based capital means the number determined under the risk-based capital formula in accordance with the risk-based capital instructions;

(2) Company action level risk-based capital means, with respect to any insurer or health organization, the product of 2.0 and its authorized control level risk-based capital;

(3) Mandatory control level risk-based capital means the product of 0.7 and the authorized control level risk-based capital; and

(4) Regulatory action level risk-based capital means the product of 1.5 and its authorized control level risk-based capital.

Laws 1993, LB 583, § 23;

Laws 1999, LB 258, § 16.